Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.020

Conversion of bank to association—Procedure.

Any bank may be converted into an association in the following manner:

(1) The trustees or directors of the bank shall pass, by at least a two-thirds favorable vote of all trustees or directors, a resolution declaring its intention to convert the bank into an association, specifying in such resolution the type of association and whether the association is to be organized under the laws of this state, or is to be organized under the laws of the United States of America. If the association is to be a state association the bank shall apply to the director of financial institutions for authority to convert into an association. The application shall include a proposal which sets forth the method by and extent to which membership or stockholder interests, as the case may be, in the bank are to be converted into membership or shareholder interest, as the case may be, in the association, and the proposal shall allow for any member or stockholder to withdraw the value of his or her interest at any time within sixty days of the completion of the conversion. The proposal is subject to the approval of the director of financial institutions and shall conform to all applicable regulations of the federal deposit insurance corporation, the federal home loan bank board, the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, or other federal regulatory agency.

(2) The director of financial institutions shall, in the case of an application to convert into a state association, make the same investigation and determine the same questions as he or she would be required by law to make in determining the case of submission to him or her of articles of incorporation of a proposed new state association, and shall also determine whether the proposed conversion would serve the needs and conveniences of the depositors of the bank.

(3) The director of financial institutions shall grant or deny the application within sixty days of its date of filing and shall immediately notify the secretary of the bank of the decision.

[ 1994 c 92 s 471; 1982 c 3 s 81; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.